Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Penalties

250.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

250.021

to

250.111

or KRS

250.361

to

250.461

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).

Any person who shall impede, hinder, or otherwise prevent, or attempt to prevent, the director or his duly authorized agent in the performance of his duty in connection with this chapter, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who violates subsection (6) of KRS

250.601

shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Except as provided by subsection (3) of this section, any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

250.491

to

250.631

may be fined up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the third and subsequent violations made within a twenty-four (24) month period.

History.

42h-6, 1376b-24, 1719a-9, 1719a-10, 1822-4, 1822-9: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 233, § 11(1); 1972, ch. 24, § 16; 1984, ch. 191, § 20, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 356, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 200, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 370, § 14, effective April 8, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 173, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 502, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 163, § 2, effective June 24, 2003.

250.991.
Penalties for violation of anhydrous ammonia provisions.

Except as provided in KRS

250.489

or

250.489

2, any person who violates any provision of KRS

250.482

to

250.488

shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person who knowingly possesses anhydrous ammonia in a container other than an approved container in violation of KRS

250.489

is guilty of a Class D felony unless it is proven that the person violated KRS

250.489

with the intent to manufacture methamphetamine in violation of KRS

218A.1432

, in which case it is a Class B felony for the first offense and a Class A felony for each subsequent offense.

A violation of KRS

250.4892

is a Class D felony unless it is proven that the person violated KRS

250.4892

with the intent to manufacture methamphetamine in violation of KRS

218A.1432

, in which case it is a Class B felony for the first offense and a Class A felony for each subsequent offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 62, § 5, effective June 19, 1958; 2000, ch. 233, § 7, effective July 14, 2000.

250.992.
Penalties for agricultural limestone violations.

Any person violating any of the provisions of KRS

250.650

to

250.720

shall upon conviction thereof be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each separate violation of KRS

250.650

to

250.720

shall constitute a separate offense and be punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300) or by imprisonment in jail for ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 160, § 9, effective June 16, 1960.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Anyone selling a product labeled as liquid lime which is advertised as reducing the acidity of soil is subject to the penalties for the violations contemplated by this section.

OAG 76-39

.